Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.710

Owners of buildings equipped with fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, or smoke control systems—Duties—Penalty.

(1) At a minimum, owners of buildings equipped with fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, or smoke control systems must:

(a) Have all newly installed fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, and smoke control systems tested and inspected within twelve months of installation;

(b) Have all fire dampers, smoke dampers, and combination fire and smoke dampers tested and inspected at least once every four years, or every six years for hospitals, regardless of the date of initial installation; and

(c) Have all smoke control systems tested and inspected at least once every six to twelve months, as required by the applicable national fire protection association standard.

(2) All owners of buildings subject to chapter 88, Laws of 2020 must maintain full inspection and testing reports on the property and make such reports available for inspection upon request by the local authority.

(3) Fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, and smoke control systems must be installed, inspected, tested, and maintained in accordance with chapter 88, Laws of 2020, manufacturers' guidelines, and the applicable industry standards.

(4) A building owner who fails to comply with the requirements of this section may be issued a civil infraction by the local authority in accordance with RCW 19.27.740.

[ 2020 c 88 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 88: See note following RCW 19.27.700.